District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.15

Water not to be diverted beyond District.

Except as provided in §§ 34-2401.16 and 34-2401.17 no portion of the water conveyed or to be conveyed through or by means of the Washington Aqueduct, or any appurtenance thereof, shall be diverted to the supply or use of any building, premises or establishment located outside of the limits of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1893, 27 Stat. 544, ch. 199

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1538.
1973 Ed., § 43-1529.

Prior Codifications